Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children and sections 79-2202 to 79-2205:

(1) Council means the State Council on Educational Opportunity for Military Children;

(2) Department means the State Department of Education;

(3) Local education agency means a school district as defined in section 79-101; and

(4) State superintendent of education means the Commissioner of Education.

Laws 2011, LB575, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 53.